Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.110

Clean energy coordinated permitting process—Initial assessment.

(1) Upon the request of a proponent of a clean energy project, the department of ecology must conduct an initial assessment to determine the level of coordination needed, taking into consideration the complexity of the project and the experience of those expected to be involved in the project application and review process.

(2) The initial project assessment must consider the complexity, size, and need for assistance of the project and must address as appropriate:

(a) The expected type of environmental review;

(b) The state and local permits or approvals that are anticipated to be required for the project;

(c) The permit application forms and other application requirements of the participating permit agencies;

(d) The anticipated information needs and issues of concern of each participating agency; and

(e) The anticipated time required for the environmental review process under chapter 43.21C RCW and permit decisions by each participating agency, including the estimated time required to determine if the permit applications are complete, to conduct the environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW, and conduct permitting processes for each participating agency. In determining the estimated time required, full consideration must be given to achieving the greatest possible efficiencies through any concurrent studies and any consolidated applications, hearings, and comment periods.

(3) The outcome of the initial assessment must be documented in writing, furnished to the project proponent, and be made available to the public.

(4) The initial assessment must be completed within 60 days of the clean energy project proponent's request to the department under this section, unless information on the project is not complete.

[ 2023 c 230 s 205.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.